North Carolina statutes. Chapter 128. Offices and Public Officers.
Article 3. Retirement System for Counties, Cities and Towns.
§ 128-38.4A.
Forfeiture of retirement benefits for certain felonies related to employment or holding office.

Except as provided in G.S. 128-26(x), the Board of Trustees shall not pay any retirement benefits or allowances, except for a return of member contributions plus interest, to any member who is convicted of any felony under federal law or the laws of this State if all of the following apply:

The offense is committed while the member is in service.

The conduct resulting in the member’s conviction is directly related to the member’s office or employment.

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-48, s. 4.3(b), effective June 26, 2020.

If a member or former member whose benefits under the System were forfeited under this section, except for the return of member contributions plus interest, subsequently receives an unconditional pardon of innocence, or the conviction is vacated or set aside for any reason, then the member or former member may seek a reversal of the benefit forfeiture by presenting sufficient evidence to the State Treasurer. If the State Treasurer determines a reversal of the benefit forfeiture is appropriate, then all benefits will be restored upon repayment of all accumulated contributions plus interest. Repayment of all accumulated contributions that have been received by the individual under the forfeiture provisions of this section must be made in a total lump-sum payment with interest compounded annually at a rate of six and one-half percent (6.5%) for each calendar year from the year of forfeiture to the year of repayment. An individual receiving a reversal of benefit forfeiture must receive reinstatement of the service credit forfeited.

History.

2012-193, s. 3; 2020-48, s. 4.3(b).

Cross References.

As to forfeiture of retirement benefits in the Legislative Retirement System for certain felonies related to employment or holding office, see

G.S. 120-4.33

A.

As to forfeiture of retirement benefits in the Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees for certain felonies related to employment or holding office, see

G.S. 135-18.10

A.

As to forfeiture of retirement benefits under the Judicial Retirement Act for certain felonies related to employment or holding office, see

G.S. 135-75.1

A.

§ 128-38.4B.
Prohibition on purchase of forfeited service.

Any member whose retirement benefits have been forfeited under

G.S. 128-38.4

or

G.S. 128-38.4

A is prohibited from subsequently purchasing or repurchasing either those forfeited benefits or any creditable membership service associated with those forfeited benefits and that service may not be used for the purposes of eligibility for benefits in any retirement system that provides reciprocal benefits.

History.

2018-52, s. 6(b); 2020-48, s. 4.5(b).

§ 128-38.5.
Improper receipt of decedent’s retirement allowance.

A person is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor if the person, with the intent to defraud, receives money as a result of cashing, depositing, or receiving a direct deposit of a decedent’s retirement allowance and the person (i) knows that he or she is not entitled to the decedent’s retirement allowance, (ii) receives the benefit at least two months after the date of the retiree’s or beneficiary’s death, and (iii) does not attempt to inform this Retirement System of the retiree’s or beneficiary’s death.

History.

2011-232, s. 10(b); 2013-288, s. 9(c).

§ 128-38.6.
Employee protection and remedies against unlawful retaliation for furnishing information to the Retirement Systems Division.

In the absence of fraud or malice, no person who furnishes information to the staff of the Retirement Systems Division relating to the investigation of possible violations of retirement law shall be liable for damages in a civil action for any oral or written statement made or any other action that is necessary to supply such information to the Division.

Any employee of a participating local employer who is discharged, demoted, suspended, threatened, harassed, or in any other manner discriminated against in the terms and conditions of employment by the employee’s employer because of lawful acts done by the employee in furtherance of the Retirement Systems Division’s receipt of information concerning possible violations of retirement law, including cooperation with the Division’s investigation of possible violations, shall be entitled to all relief necessary to make the employee whole. Relief shall include reinstatement with the same seniority status as the employee would have had but for the discrimination or retaliation by the employing unit, two times the amount of back pay, interest on the back pay, and compensation for any special damages sustained as a result of the discrimination or retaliation, including litigation costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees. An employee may bring an action in superior court for the relief provided in this section.

History.

2012-185, s. 1.

§§ 128-38.7 through 128-38.9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 128-38.10.
Qualified Excess Benefit Arrangement.

The following words and phrases as used in this section, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, have the following meanings:

“Board of Trustees” means the Board of Trustees established by

G.S. 128-28

.

“Internal Revenue Code” means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time.

“Payee” means a retired member, or the survivor beneficiary of a member or retired member.

“Qualified Excess Benefit Arrangement” means the qualified excess benefit arrangement under section 415(m) of the Internal Revenue Code established under this Article.

“Retirement System” means the North Carolina Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System.

The Qualified Excess Benefit Arrangement (QEBA) is established effective January 1, 2014, and placed under the management of the Board of Trustees. The purpose of the QEBA is solely to provide the part of a retirement allowance or benefit that would otherwise have been payable by the North Carolina Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System except for the limitations under section 415(b) of the Internal Revenue Code. The QEBA, as set forth in this section, is intended to constitute a qualified governmental excess benefit arrangement under section 415(m) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Eligibility to Participate in the QEBA. — Effective as of January 1, 2014, a payee shall participate in the QEBA for any calendar year, or portion of the calendar year, during which he or she receives a retirement allowance or benefit payment on and after January 1, 2014, from the North Carolina Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System that is reduced due to the application of the maximum benefit provisions of section 415(b) of the Internal Revenue Code. For purposes of the QEBA, a payee is a retired member or survivor beneficiary of a member or retired member who is receiving monthly retirement benefit payments from a Retirement System.

Supplemental Benefit Payable Under the QEBA. — Effective January 1, 2014, a payee shall receive each month, commencing on and after January 1, 2014, a monthly supplemental benefit equal to the difference between the amount of that payee’s monthly retirement benefit paid under the North Carolina Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System on and after January 1, 2014, and the amount that would have been payable to that payee from the North Carolina Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System in that month if not for the reduction due to the application of section 415(b) of the Internal Revenue Code. That supplemental benefit shall be computed and payable under the same terms, at the same time, and to the same person as the related benefit payable under the Retirement System. A payee cannot elect to defer the receipt of all or any part of the supplemental payments due under the QEBA. The supplemental benefit paid under this section shall be taxable under North Carolina law in the same manner as the benefit paid under the North Carolina Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System.

(d1)

The last employer of a payee who retires on or after August 1, 2016, and who receives any supplemental benefit payment under this section shall be required to reimburse the QEBA in the amount of any supplemental benefit payment made to that payee. The reimbursement amount shall be calculated on an annual basis every calendar year. For purposes of calculating the reimbursement amount, the Board of Trustees may include a pro rata share of direct costs attributable to administration of the QEBA. The Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly shall be required to review all reimbursement amounts prior to notifying an employer of the reimbursement amount owed.The employer shall have 60 calendar days from the date of notification of the reimbursement amount owed to pay the amount in full or the employer shall be assessed a penalty, in lieu of interest, of one percent (1%) per month, or fraction thereof, that the payment is made beyond the due date.

Funding of the QEBA. — The QEBA shall be unfunded within the meaning of federal tax laws. No payee contributions or deferrals, direct or indirect, by election or otherwise shall be made or allowed. The Board of Trustees, upon the recommendation of the actuary engaged by the Board of Trustees, shall determine the employer contributions required to pay the benefits due under the QEBA for each fiscal year. The required contributions shall be paid by all participating employers. The required contributions shall be deposited in a separate fund from the fund into which regular employer contributions are deposited for the underlying Retirement System. The benefit liability for the QEBA shall be determined each fiscal year and assets shall not be accumulated to pay benefits in future fiscal years.

Treatment of Unused Assets. — Any assets of the QEBA plan not used to pay benefits in the current calendar year shall be used for payment of the administrative expenses of the QEBA for the current or future calendar years or shall be paid to the Retirement System as an additional employer contribution.

Assets Subject to Claims of Creditors. — A payee, or a payee’s beneficiary or heirs, shall have no right to, and shall have no property interest in, any assets held to support the liabilities created under this section. To the extent that any person acquires the right to receive benefits under the QEBA, that right shall be no greater than the right of any unsecured general creditor of the State of North Carolina or such other applicable employer under this section.

Administration. — The QEBA shall be administered by the Board of Trustees, which shall compile and maintain all records necessary or appropriate for administration. The Board of Trustees shall have full discretionary authority to interpret, construe, and implement the QEBA and to adopt such rules and regulations as may be necessary or desirable to implement the provisions of the QEBA in accordance with section 415(m) of the Internal Revenue Code.

No Assignment. — Except for the application of the provisions of

G.S. 110-136

and

G.S. 110-136.3

, et seq., or in connection with a court-ordered equitable distribution under

G.S. 50-20

, any supplemental benefit under this section shall be exempt from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment, or any other process, and shall be unassignable except as specifically otherwise provided in this section.

Reservation of Power to Change. — The General Assembly reserves the right at any time and, from time to time, to modify or amend, in whole or in part, any or all of the provisions of the QEBA. No member of the Retirement System and no beneficiary of such a member shall be deemed to have acquired any vested right to a supplemental payment under this section.

Sunset of Eligibility to Participate in the QEBA. — No member of the North Carolina Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System who became a member of the Retirement System on or after January 1, 2015, shall be eligible to participate in the QEBA, and the Retirement System shall not pay any new member more retirement benefits than allowed under the limitations of section 415(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.

History.

2013-405, s. 3(b); 2015-67, s. 3(b); 2015-241, s. 30.30A(b); 2016-94, s. 36.23(b), (d).